Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB508.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 199.884 is amended to read as follows:
The cabinet, or its designated department, shall promulgate administrative regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to effectuate the provisions of KRS 199.881 to
199.888, including:
(1) Creating a standardized agreement for employers, employees, and providers
wishing to participate in the program, to be completed and agreed to by each
respective party that includes:
(a) Name, physical location, size, and industry of the employer;
(b) Name and phone number of the employer's point of contact;
(c) Name and physical location of the child-care provider;
(d) Name and phone number of the child-care provider's point of contact;
(e) Name and home address of the employee;
(f) Total contribution to be paid by the employer to the provider, either directly
or through a third-party vendor;
(g) Total amount of the state match to be paid to the provider, either directly or
through a third-party vendor;
(h) Duration of the contract, which shall not last beyond the end of the state's
fiscal year in any given year;
(i) Frequency of the contribution to be made directly to the child-care provider in
accordance with the provider's established billing cycle; and
(j) Demographic information of the employee;
(2) Establishing eligibility verification procedures for the following parties as a
prerequisite for the cabinet entering the agreement as a party and issuing a state
match:
(a) Employer's enrollment in the program;
Page 1 of 2
BR123600.100 - 1236 - XXXX 3/11/2025 4:05 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1236
(b) Employee's eligibility; and
(c) Child-care provider's eligibility;
(3) Collecting and verifying household income information from eligible employees
and determining the amount of the state match for which the employee is eligible in
accordance with KRS 199.885;
(4) Creating procedures for issuing a notice to all parties to the agreement of:
(a) Their enrollment in the program upon receiving and processing the contract
and determining eligibility; and
(b) Any changes to the application process that may affect reapplication for the
program;
(5) Compiling confidentiality protocols for the cabinet and its designated department or
departments to safeguard the personal information of participating employees,
employers, and child-care providers;
(6) Introducing reporting requirements for an employer or a child-care provider
reporting a lapse or nonpayment of contribution towards eligible child-care
services;
(7) Creating procedures for issuing and logging a state match to child-care providers
pursuant to the respective contract;
(8) Maintaining records of the fund in the fiscal year and all payments;
(9) Creating criteria for participant disqualification from the program;
(10) Establishing procedures for appeals hearings;[ and]
(11) Establishing procedures for recouping state matches or portions of state matches
that result in overpayments to participating child-care providers; and
(12) Ensuring that the standardized agreement created in subsection (1)_ of this
section shall be:
(a) Accessible, viewable, and downloadable on the cabinet website; and
(b) Allowed to be submitted via first-class mail, email, or online portal.
Page 2 of 2
BR123600.100 - 1236 - XXXX 3/11/2025 4:05 PM Jacketed